src/phonetics/text2ipa-sme.xfscript
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ===================================== !
! Phonological converter for North Sámi - real SME words !
! ===================================== !

! To eventual curious readers
! This file tries out conversion from Sámi orthography to a phonetic
! translation based upon IPA. There is a switch at the end to get 
! different formats: SAMPA, Fenno-Ugric transcription or Finnish
! orthography.

! Usage: Compile sme as usual:
! make GTLANG=sme
! Pipe text through the analyser:
! cat text | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT bin/phon-sme.fst | ..

!We may also add POS tagging:
! cat corp/pedkorpus.txt | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/pos-sme.fst | tr '\t' '+' | cut -d"+" -f1,3 | uniq | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sme.fst | cut -f2 | l

! In order to make this better we should uniq the closed POS before giving them
! to the phonological analyser (TODO: Check whether output is ok).

! We might also add syllable boundaries. Here the simple version:
!cat corp/pedkorpus.txt | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/hyphrules-sme.fst | cut -f2 | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sme.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' '  | see

! echo "dat lea 123" | preprocess | 
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/sme-num.fst | cut -f2 |
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/hyphrules-sme.fst | cut -f2 | 
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sme.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' ' | l


!echo <<defining POS tags...>>
!
!define POSTAG %+N -> %+N,
!              %+A -> %+A, 
!              %+V -> %+V,
!              %+Adv -> %+X, 
!              %+Pron -> %+X,
!              %+CS -> %+X,
!              %+CC -> %+X,
!              %+Adp -> %+X,
!              %+Po -> %+X,
!              %+Pr -> %+X,
!              %+Interj -> %+X,
!              %+Pcle -> %+X,
!              %+Num -> %+X, 
!              %+CLB -> %+CLB ;


echo <<defining Vow and Cns...>>



define Vow       [ a | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | 
                   á | é | í | ó | ú | ý |
                   à | è | ì | ò | ù | 
                   â | ê | î | ô | û | 
                   ä | ë | ï | ö | ü | 
                   ă | ĕ | ĭ | ŭ | ŏ |
                   ã | 
                   ɑ | ə | 

                   A | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | 
                   Á | É | Í | Ó | Ú | Ý |
                   À | È | Ì | Ò | Ù | 
                   Â | Ê | Î | Ô | Û | 
                   Ä | Ë | Ï | Ö | Ü | 
                   Ã | 

                   ː ] ;

define Cns [ b | c | č | ç | d | đ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | 
             B | C | Č | Ç | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | 
             p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | þ | v | w | x | z | ž |   
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | Þ | V | W | X | Z | Ž |
             ɟ | ʎ | ʃ |  ʔ |
             ː ] ;

define Sgm [ Vow | Cns ] ;

define Stop [ p | t | k | c | č ] ;

define Alv [ t | T | d | D | ŧ | Ŧ | đ | Đ | s | S | l | L | r | R | n | N ] ;

define Son [ m | n | ŋ | l | r | j | v | đ ] ;

define Nas [ m | M | n | N | ŋ | Ŋ ] ;

define Diphthong  [ i e | ĭ ĕ | ĭ e
                  | e a | ĕ ă | ĕ a | e ä | ĕ ä | ĕ æ | e æ
                  | u o | ŭ ŏ | ŭ o
                  | o a | ŏ ă | ŏ a  
                  ] ;

define WordBorder [ .#. | %# | %- ] ;

define StressBorder [ WordBorder | %» ] ;

! ^SL = Secondary Lengthening
define Dummy %^SL ;

! Define a syllable without Onset:
define SyllWOOnset Vow+ Cns* (Dummy) Cns* (ə) %^ ;

! Define a full syllable:
define Syll Cns* SyllWOOnset ;

echo << Downcasing rules>>

define down [ A -> a, E -> e, I -> i, O -> o, U -> u, Y -> y, 
              Á -> á, É -> é, Í -> í, Ó -> ó, Ú -> ú, Ý -> ý, 
              À -> à, È -> è, Ì -> ì, Ò -> ò, Ù -> ù, 
              Â -> â, Ê -> ê, Î -> î, Ô -> ô, Û -> û, 
              Ä -> ä, Ë -> ë, Ï -> ï, Ö -> ö, Ü -> ü, 
              Ã -> ã,
              Æ -> æ, Ø -> ø, Å -> å, 

              B -> b, C -> c, Č -> č, Ç -> ç, D -> d, Đ -> đ, 
              F -> f, G -> g, H -> h, J -> j, K -> k, L -> l, 
              M -> m, N -> n, Ŋ -> ŋ, P -> p, Q -> q, R -> r, 
              S -> s, Š -> š, T -> t, Ŧ -> ŧ, Þ -> þ, V -> v, 
              W -> w, X -> x, Z -> z, Ž -> ž
              ] ;




echo << Rules >>


! Here comes the other rules

define ijRule  i -> j || Vow _ ;

define slRule  s -> š || WordBorder _ l ;

define snjRule s -> š || WordBorder _ n j ;

!StrongGrade, StopCluster, StrongNasalClusters, VzzRule, LongPalatalAffricate
! Ikke LatusLengthening etter QIII
! QIII er C1C1^ eller Cə^
!LatusLength må komme før primary lengthening og secondary lengthening
! Vi skal ha gab:ba, og gap:pa:, pas:sa:ht, <gabba, gappa, bassat>

define StrongGrade    m %^ b     -> m m %^ p     ,
                      m %^ p     -> m m %^ M p   ,
                      m %^ s     -> m m %^ s     ,
                      m %^ v     -> m m %^ v     ,
                      m %^ š     -> m m %^ š     ,
                      m %^ š k   -> m m %^ š k   ,
                      
                      d %^ n     -> n n %^ ʔ n    ,
                      b %^ m     -> m m %^ ʔ m    ,
                      d %^ n j   -> n j n j %^ ʔ n j  ,
                      g %^ ŋ     -> n j n j %^ ʔ n j  ,

                      s %^ p     -> s s %^ p     ,
                      s %^ m     -> s s %^ m     ,

                      š %^ p     -> š š %^ p     ,
                      š %^ k     -> š š %^ k     ,
                      š %^ m     -> š š %^ m     ,
                      š %^ v     -> š š %^ v     ,

                      n %^ c     -> n n %^ N t s ,
                      n %^ d     -> n n %^ t     ,
                      ŋ %^ g     -> ŋ ŋ %^ k     ,
                      n %^ g     -> ŋ ŋ %^ k     ,
                      n %^ j     -> n n %^ j     ,
                      n %^ n j   -> n j %^ n j   ,
                      ŋ %^ k     -> ŋ ŋ %^ Ŋ k   ,
                      n %^ k     -> ŋ ŋ %^ Ŋ k   ,
                      n %^ s     -> n n %^ s     ,
                      n %^ t     -> n n %^ N t   ,
                      n %^ v     -> n n %^ v     ,
                      n %^ z     -> n n %^ t s   ,
                      n %^ č     -> n n %^ N t š ,
                      n %^ š     -> n n %^   š   ,
                      n %^ s k   -> n n %^ s k   ,
                      n %^ s t   -> n n %^ s t   ,
                      n %^ ž     -> n n %^   t š ,

                      l %^ r     -> l ə %^   r   ,
                      l %^ b     -> l ə %^   p   ,
                      l %^ f     -> l ə %^   f   ,
                      l %^ k     -> l ə %^ h k   ,
                      l %^ p     -> l ə %^ h p   ,
                      l %^ s     -> l ə %^   s   ,
                      l %^ v     -> l ə %^   v   ,
                      l %^ š     -> l ə %^   š   ,
                      l %^ l j   -> ʎ ʎ %^ ʎ     ,
                      l %^ z     -> l l %^ d s   ,
                      l %^ ž     -> l l %^ d š   ,
                      l %^ t     -> l l %^ L t   ,
                      l %^ c     -> l l %^ L t s ,
                      l %^ č     -> l l %^ L t š ,
                      l %^ s k   -> l l %^ s k   ,
                      l %^ s t   -> l l %^ s t   ,
                      l %^ b m   -> l ə %^ ʔ m   ,
                      l %^ d n   -> l l %^ ʔ n   ,
                      l %^ g ŋ   -> l ə %^ ʔ n j   ,

                      v %^ l     -> w w %^ l     ,
                      v %^ d     -> w w %^ t     ,
                      v %^ g     -> w w %^ k     ,
                      v %^ p     -> w w %^ W p   ,
                      v %^ j     -> w w %^ j     ,
                      v %^ k     -> w w %^ W k   ,
                      v %^ r     -> w w %^ r     ,
                      v %^ h l   -> w w %^ L     ,
                      v %^ t     -> w w %^ W t   ,
                      v %^ s k   -> w w %^ s k   ,
                      v %^ z     -> w w %^ t s   ,
                      v %^ d n j -> w w %^ ʔ n j ,
                      v %^ d n   -> w w %^ ʔ n   ,
                      v %^ ž     -> w w %^ t š   ,
                      v %^ s t   -> w w %^ s t   ,


                      j %^ r     -> j j %^     r ,
                      j %^ b     -> j j %^     p ,
                      j %^ f     -> j j %^     f ,
                      j %^ l     -> j j %^     l ,
                      j %^ k     -> j j %^   J k ,
                      j %^ p     -> j j %^   J p ,
                      j %^ s     -> j j %^     s ,
                      j %^ v     -> j j %^     v ,
                      j %^ h l   -> j j %^     L ,
                      j %^ z     -> j j %^   d s ,
                      j %^ h m   -> j j %^     M ,
                      j %^ t     -> j j %^   J t ,
                      j %^ c     -> j j %^ J t s ,
                      j %^ h n   -> j j %^     N ,
                      j %^ s t   -> j j %^   s t ,
                      j %^ s k   -> j j %^   s k ,
                      j %^ b m   -> j j %^   ʔ m ,
                      j %^ d n   -> j j %^   ʔ n ,
                      j %^ g ŋ   -> j j %^   ʔ n ,


                      r %^ b     -> r ə %^     p ,
                      r %^ f     -> r ə %^     f ,
                      r %^ g     -> r ə %^     k ,
                      r %^ j     -> r ə %^     j ,
                      r %^ k     -> r ə %^   h k ,
                      r %^ p     -> r ə %^   h p ,
                      r %^ s     -> r ə %^     s ,
                      r %^ t     -> r ə %^   h t ,
                      r %^ v     -> r ə %^     v ,
                      r %^ š     -> r ə %^     š ,
                      r %^ z     -> r ə %^   d s ,
                      r %^ ž     -> r ə %^   d š ,
                      r %^ c     -> r ə %^ h t s ,
                      r %^ č     -> r ə %^ h t š ,
                      r %^ s k   -> r ə %^ s k ,
                      r %^ s t   -> r ə %^ s t ,
                      r %^ b m   -> r ə %^ ʔ m ,
                      r %^ d n   -> r ə %^ ʔ m ,
                      r %^ g ŋ   -> r ə %^ ʔ n j ,
                      r %^ d n j -> r ə %^ ʔ n j ,

                      đ %^ b     -> đ ə %^     p ,
                      đ %^ g     -> đ ə %^     k ,
                      đ %^ j     -> đ ə %^     j ,
                      đ %^ v     -> đ ə %^     v ,
                      đ %^ b m   -> đ ə %^     ʔ m ,
                      đ %^ g ŋ   -> đ ə %^     ʔ n j 
                      || Vow+ _ Vow ;
